errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON VIHTTADUHAT
 +Num+Sg+Nom:htta%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:htta%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:htta%>#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:đa%>#duhát»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:đa%>#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:đa%>#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:đa%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:đa%>#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:đa%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:đa%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:đa%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON CIEZADUHAT
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#duhát»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIDUHAT
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n#duháh%>in K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duháh%>a K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#duhát»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#duháh%>is K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#duháh%>in K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#duháh%>at K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#duháh%>ij K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd9#duháh%>iX5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde#duháh%>ijdda K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#duháh%>ijn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jd9#duháh%>ijgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn#duháh%>ijgujn K ;



LEXICON NUPPELOHKAI
nuppe#:nuppe# LOHKAI-END ;
goalmmát#:goalmmát# LOHKAI-END ;
njealját#:njealját# LOHKAI-END ;
viđát#:viđát# LOHKAI-END ;
guđát#:guđát# LOHKAI-END ;
čihččet#:čihččet# LOHKAI-END ;
gávccát#:gávccát# LOHKAI-END ;
ovccát#:ovccát# LOHKAI-END ;
logát#:logát# LOHKAI-END ;


LEXICON LOHKAI-END
logis:loh'kis OVCCIS ;
logát+A+Ord:logád VUOSTTAS ;



LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS  ! numeral as first part
 NAMAT ;            ! duhatjienat, logigielat, etc. NAMAT derivs are
                    ! treated as compounds and excluded from the nonrec
                    ! variants, otherwise the PLX lexicon size explodes
 SAS ;
 NounSecond ; ! golmmačiegahas
 +Cmpnd+Use/NG:- # ; ! golmma- ! Awaiting the +Cmpnd fix for apertium we just suppress it
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;
! !duhat#geardásaš
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ;


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON num-ordinal
num-ordinal-1 ;
num-ordinal-2to9 ;

LEXICON num-ordinal-1 
vuosttas+A+Ord:vuosttas VUOSTTAS ;
vuosttaš+A+Ord:vuosttaž VUOSTTAS ;

LEXICON num-ordinal-2to9 
nubbi+A+Ord:nubbi%> nubbicase ;
goalmmát+A+Ord:goalmmád VUOSTTAS ;
njealját+A+Ord:njealjád VUOSTTAS ;
viđát+A+Ord:viđád VUOSTTAS ;
guđát+A+Ord:guđád VUOSTTAS ;
čihččet+A+Ord:čihččed VUOSTTAS ;
gihččet+A+Ord:gihččed VUOSTTAS ;
gávccát+A+Ord:gávccád VUOSTTAS ;
ovccát+A+Ord:ovccád VUOSTTAS ;
!logát+A+Ord:logád VUOSTTAS ;
!čuođát+A+Ord:čuođád VUOSTTAS ;
!duháhat+A+Ord:duháh VUOSTTAS ;
!millijovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag VUOSTTAS ;
!miljonat+A+Ord:miljonag VUOSTTAS ;

LEXICON VUOSTTAS
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 :%> GAPPUS- ;
! +A: EABBO/EAMOS ; ! No comparatives here
 +Attr:%> K ;

! Collective numerals
! ---------------

LEXICON num-collective
ovttas:ok'tas OVCCIS ;
guovttis+N+Coll+Sg+Nom:guovttes%> K ;
guovttis:guok'tis GUOVTTIS ;
golmmas:golbmas OVCCIS ;
njealjis:njealljis OVCCIS ;
viđas:vi VIDAS ;
guđas:gu VIDAS ;
čiežas:čiehččas%> CIEZAS ;
čiežas:čieh'čas OVCCIS ;
giežas:gieh'čas OVCCIS ;
gávccis:gák'cis OVCCIS ;
ovccis:ok'cis OVCCIS ;

LEXICON CIEZAS ! Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub: K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom: PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG: R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen: PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc: PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:asa%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom:ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com:ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com:ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON VIDAS ! Collective numerals
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:đas%> K ;
 +N+Coll+Ess:đas%>in K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:httas%> K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc:httas%>a K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:httas%> K ;  !
 +N+Coll+Pl+Nom:httas%>at K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Ill:httas%>ij K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc:httas%>is K ;
 +N+Coll+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:httas%>in K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Sg+Com:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Gen:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Acc:httas%>iX5jd K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Ill:httas%>ijdda K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc:httas%>ijn K ;
 +N+Coll+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:httas%>ijs K ;  ! !SOUTH
 +N+Coll+Pl+Com:httas%>ijgujn K ;
 +Sg+Nom:httas%> PxC ;
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%>a R ;  !compound also for these
 +CmpN/SgG:httas%> R ;  !compound also for these
 +Sg+Gen:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Acc:httas%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Ill:httas%>asa PxV ;
 +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Sg+Loc:httas%>istti%> PxV ;
 +Sg+Com:httas%>ijnni%> PxV ;
! +Pl+Nom:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Gen:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Acc:httas%>ijddi%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Ill:httas%>ijddás%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:httas%>ijnni%> PxV ;
 +Pl+Com:httas%>ijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;



! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES 
 §+Use/Circ:§ ARABIC ; ! §24 !
 §§+Use/Circ:§§ ARABIC ; ! §§24 !
 §% +Use/Circ:§%  ARABIC ; ! § 24 !
 §§% +Use/Circ:§§%  ARABIC ; ! §§ 24 !
 %-+Use/Circ:%- ARABIC ; ! -24 !
 %‒+Use/Circ:%‒ ARABIC ; ! -24 U
 %–+Use/Circ:%– ARABIC ; ! -24 U
 %—+Use/Circ:%— ARABIC ; ! -24 U
 %―+Use/Circ:%― ARABIC ; ! -24 U
 %++Use/Circ:%+ ARABIC ; ! <plus>24 !
 %-% +Use/Circ:%-%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 !
 %‒% +Use/Circ:%‒%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 2012 !
 %–% +Use/Circ:%–%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 2013 !
 %—% +Use/Circ:%—%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 2014 !
 %―% +Use/Circ:%―%  ARABIC ; ! - 24 2015 !
 %+% +Use/Circ:%+%  ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24 !
 %*+Use/Circ:%* ARABIC ; ! *24 !
 %$+Use/Circ:%$ ARABIC ; ! $24 ! And the Euro? !
 %<+Use/Circ:%< ARABIC ; ! <24 !
 %>+Use/Circ:%>7 ARABIC ; ! >24 !
 %.+Use/Circ:%. ARABIC ; ! s.24 !



LEXICON ARABIC !^C^
< [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9] > ARABICLOOP ; !^C^
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD ;	!^C^		
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPCOLL ;	!^C^		

LEXICON 11TO99F
okta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
guokte# NUPPELOHKAI ;
golbma# NUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallje# NUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallja# NUPPELOHKAI ;
vihtta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
guhtta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
čieža# NUPPELOHKAI ;
gieža# NUPPELOHKAI ;
gávcci# NUPPELOHKAI ;
ovcci# NUPPELOHKAI ;
LEXICON 21TO99
guokte#logi#:guokte#logi num-ordinal ;
golbma#logi#:golbma#logi# num-ordinal ;
njeallje#logi#:njeallje#logi# num-ordinal ;
njeallja#logi#:njeallja#logi# num-ordinal ;
vihtta#logi#:vihtta#logi# num-ordinal ;
guhtta#logi#:guhtta#logi# num-ordinal ;
čieža#logi#:čieža#logi# num-ordinal ;
gieža#logi#:gieža#logi# num-ordinal ;
gávcci#logi#:gávcci#logi# num-ordinal ;
ovcci#logi#:ovcci#logi# num-ordinal ;
guokte#logi# num-collective ;
golbma#logi# num-collective ;
njeallje#logi# num-collective ;
njeallja#logi# num-collective ;
vihtta#logi# num-collective ;
guhtta#logi# num-collective ;
čieža#logi# num-collective ;
gieža#logi# num-collective ;
gávcci#logi# num-collective ;
ovcci#logi# num-collective ;
LEXICON 111TO119
okta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
guokte# NUPPELOHKAI ;
golbma# NUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallje# NUPPELOHKAI ;
njeallja# NUPPELOHKAI ;
vihtta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
guhtta# NUPPELOHKAI ;
čieža# NUPPELOHKAI ;
gieža# NUPPELOHKAI ;
gávcci# NUPPELOHKAI ;
ovcci# NUPPELOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi#+Num+Sg+Gen:čuođi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čuođi#guokte# LOHKAI-END  ;
čuođi#golbma# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#njeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#vihtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#guhtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#čieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#gieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#gávcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođi#ovcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuođát+A+Ord:čuođád VUOSTTAS ;
okta#čuohti#guokte# LOHKAI-END  ;
okta#čuohti#golbma# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#njeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#vihtta# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#guhtta# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#čieža# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#gieža# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#gávcci# LOHKAI-END ;
okta#čuohti#ovcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuoh0ti#+Num+Attr:čuohti»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
čuohti#guokte# LOHKAI-END  ;
čuohti#golbma# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#njeallje# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#vihtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#guhtta# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#čieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#gieža# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#gávcci# LOHKAI-END ;
čuohti#ovcci# LOHKAI-END ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
gallát+A+Ord:gallád VUOSTTAS ;
máŋga#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr:máŋgga#lot# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 máŋga#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:máŋggaloht# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;          !
máŋga#logi#+Num+Sg+Gen:máŋggalogi# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
moadde#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:moatti%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; ! !Dialect
moadde#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr:moatte%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
moadde#logi#+Num+Sg+Gen:moatti%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
moadde#logi#+Num+Sg+Gen:moatte%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
galle#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr:galle%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
galle#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr:galle%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
beal#goalmmát+A+Ord:beal#goalmmád VUOSTTAS ;
beal#njealját+A+Ord:beal#njealjád VUOSTTAS ;
beal#viđát+A+Ord:beal#viđád VUOSTTAS ;
beal#guđat+A+Ord:beal#guđad VUOSTTAS ;
beal#čihččet+A+Ord:beal#čihččed VUOSTTAS ;
beal#gihččet+A+Ord:beal#gihččed VUOSTTAS ;
beal#gávccát+A+Ord:beal#gávccád VUOSTTAS ;
beal#ovccát+A+Ord:beal#ovccád VUOSTTAS ;
beal#logát+A+Ord:beal#logád VUOSTTAS ;
